Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 2. Acquisition of Property.

Sec. 19.05.080.
Acquisition of land, easements, and materials by purchase or eminent domain.

The department on behalf of the state and as part of the cost of constructing or maintaining a highway may purchase in the open market, acquire, take over, or condemn under the right and power of eminent domain land in fee simple or easements that it considers necessary for present public use, either temporary or permanent, or that it considers necessary and reasonable for the public use. By the same means, the department may obtain material, including clay, gravel, sand, or rock, or the land necessary to obtain material, including access to it. The department may acquire the land or materials notwithstanding the fact that title to it is vested in the state or a department, agency, commission, or institution of the state.
Acquisition of materials by purchase in the open market under this section is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).

History.

(§ 1 art I title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 11 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For general provisions concerning eminent domain, see AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

.
For power of department of transportation and public facilities to exercise power of eminent domain, see AS

44.42.020(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 19.05.090.
Declaration of taking.

A declaration of taking in the form of an order signed by the commissioner, or by a designee of the commissioner within the department, declaring that the real property, or interest in it, or an easement, is necessary for the public use of the state vests title in the state.
However, a declaration of taking is not effective until eminent domain proceedings have been instituted in the proper court, and a copy of the declaration of taking has been recorded in the office of the recorder in the district where the land is located.
The department shall pay from the appropriate fund into court the amount it considers represents a reasonable valuation for the land, easement, or materials taken.

History.

(§ 1 art I title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For general provisions concerning eminent domain, see AS

09.55.240

—

09.55.460

; for power of Department of Transportation and Public Facilities to exercise power of eminent domain, including declaration of taking, see AS

44.42.020(b)

.

Sec. 19.05.100.
Acquisition of excess land.

When a part of a parcel of land is taken and the remainder is in a shape or condition that is of little value to its owner, or gives rise to claims or litigation concerning severance or other damage, the department may acquire the whole parcel and may sell the remainder or exchange it for other property needed for state highway rights-of-way.

History.

(§ 2(1) art I title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; added by § 3 ch 122 SLA 1960)

Sec. 19.05.110.
Authority to condemn property for purpose of exchange for public land.

When property that is devoted to or held for another public use for which the power of eminent domain may be exercised is taken for highway purposes, the department may, with the consent of the person or agency in charge of the other public use, condemn real property to be exchanged with such person or agency for the real property so taken. This section does not limit the authorization of the department to acquire, other than by condemnation, property for that purpose in any other manner.

History.

(§ 2(2) art I title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; added by § 3 ch 122 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1996, “real property to be exchanged with such person or agency for” was substituted for “the real property to be exchanged for” in order to return the language to the 1960 enactment.

Sec. 19.05.120.
Authority to purchase property for the purpose of exchange.

When the commissioner formally declares that it is in the best public interest of the state to do so, the department may acquire by purchase or otherwise privately or publicly owned land or an interest in it for the purpose of exchanging it for privately or publicly owned land which the department is authorized by law to acquire.

History.

(§ 2(3) art I title IV ch 152 SLA 1957; added by § 3 ch 122 SLA 1960)

Sec. 19.05.122.
Utility corridor and railroad right-of-way for extension of the Alaska Railroad. [Repealed, § 2 ch 45 SLA 2004. For related provisions, see AS 42.40.460 — 42.40.465.]

Sec. 19.05.123.
Fairbanks — Seward Peninsula transportation and utility corridor.

Subject to legislative appropriation, the department shall identify and delineate a proposed transportation and utility corridor between Fairbanks and the western end of the Seward Peninsula.

In performing the work required by (a) of this section,

the railroad alignment and identification of a railroad right-of-way of not less than 500 feet, together with adjacent sites that can be developed for necessary construction materials, shall guide the identification and delineation of the corridor; and

the department shall consider the following factors:

grade and alignment standards that are commensurate with rail and road construction standards;

availability of construction materials;

safety;

impacts on and service to adjacent communities;

environmental concerns;

use of public land to the maximum degree possible;

minimization of probable construction costs;

the location of, and the opportunity to obtain access to, identified natural resources that could contribute significantly to the state’s economic development; and

prior and established traditional uses.

Within 90 days after receiving a report transmitting the work of the department under (a) of this section, the commissioner shall, in conformity with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), if necessary, adopt a regulation approving, modifying, or rejecting the proposed corridor.

If the commissioner approves or modifies the proposed corridor when presented under (c) of this section,

the Department of Natural Resources shall promptly classify, or reclassify, and reserve any state land within the corridor and at adjacent sites that can be developed for necessary construction materials for use as a corridor; and

the department shall

subject to legislative appropriation, exercise its authority under AS

19.05.040

to acquire rights-of-way across land within the corridor that is subject to the state’s power of condemnation; and

work with federal officials to secure reclassification and withdrawal of federal land in the corridor for reservations and rights-of-way across the federal land for use as a corridor.

The requirements of AS 38.05 (Alaska Land Act) relating to classification and reclassification of land are inapplicable to actions taken under this section.

To complete the work required by this section, the commissioner may accept any legal gifts and grants and may enter into contracts or other transactions or agreements relating to it with the federal government, an agency or instrumentality of the state, a municipality, or a private organization.

In this section, “corridor” means the transportation and utility corridor required to be identified and delineated by (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 1994)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under § 2, ch. 83, SLA 1994, this section is repealed July 1, 2055.

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

19.25.123

. Renumbered in 1996.